Rhode Island statutes. Title 46 Waters and Navigation
Chapter 12.5.1 Oil Pollution Control

46-12.5.1-1.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter these terms shall, where the context permits, be construed to mean:

“Containment and cleanup” includes all direct and indirect efforts associated with the prevention, abatement, containment, or removal of a pollutant, the restoration of the environment to its former state, and all incidental administrative costs;

“Contaminated ballast water” means ballast water carried in uncleaned cargo tanks or mixed with oil in some other manner such that the discharge of such water would produce a visible sheen.

“Department” means the department of environmental management or its successor;

“Director” means the director of the department of environmental management;

“Oil” means oil of any kind and in any form, whether crude, refined, or a petroleum by product, including, but not limited to, petroleum, fuel oil, gasoline, lubricating oils, oily sludge, oil refuse, oil mixed with other wastes, crude oils, liquified natural gas, propane, butane, or other liquid hydrocarbons regardless of specific gravity;

“Oil pollution” means discharging, causing to be discharged, or permitting the discharge of oil into or upon the waters of this state, or to construct or install any industrial, commercial, or other establishment, to make any modification or addition thereto, or to undertake any development which may result in the discharge of oil into the waters of the state, unless the discharge is made to a system or means to prevent pollution approved by the director;

“Operator” means the person who, through contract, lease, sublease, or otherwise, exerts general supervision and control of activities including, but not limited to, a prime general contractor, the “master” of a vessel and the master’s employer or any other person who, personally or through an agent or contractor, undertakes the general functioning of the facility;

“Person” includes an individual, trust, firm, joint stock company, corporation (including a quasi government corporation), municipality, municipal or state agency, fire district, club, nonprofit agency, or country;

“Discharge” means any spilling, leaking, pumping, pouring, emitting, emptying, releasing, injecting, escaping, leaching, dumping, or disposing into the environment;

“Vessel” means every description of watercraft or other artificial contrivance used, or capable of being used, as a means of transportation on water, whether self propelled or otherwise, and includes barges and tugs;

“Waters of the state” include all surface waters including all waters of the territorial sea, tidewaters, all inland waters of any river, stream, brook, pond or lake; and all ground waters and wetlands of the state of R.I.

History of Section.

P.L. 1997, ch. 32, § 2.

46-12.5.1-2.
Powers and duties of the director.

In addition to the other powers granted the director of the department of environmental management, the director shall have and may exercise these powers and duties:

To exercise general supervision of the administration and enforcement of this chapter and all rules and regulations and orders promulgated hereunder;

To promulgate rules and regulations for the transportation of oil on the waters and over the land of this state; for the emergency response for the containment, cleanup, and abatement of a discharge of oil; for the assessment of penalties and recovery of costs and of damages as set forth in this chapter; and for any other procedures necessary for the implementation of this chapter;

To promulgate rules and regulations for oil discharge contingency plans. The rules and regulations may at the minimum:

Prohibit the transfer of oil to or from a tank vessel or oil barge without an oil discharge contingency plan that the appropriate authority has approved;

Require proof of financial responsibility by the owner or operator of the tank vessel or oil barge; and

Address catastrophic oil discharges.

To exercise all incidental powers necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter;

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to abridge the powers and duties of the director over water pollution, including the discharge of oil, as established in this title, or in chapter 17.1 or 35 of title 42, or in title 23.

History of Section.

P.L. 1997, ch. 32, § 2; P.L. 2007, ch. 340, § 42.

46-12.5.1-3.
Prohibition against oil pollution.

No person shall discharge, cause to be discharged, or permit the discharge of oil into, or upon the waters or land of the state except by regulation or by permit from the director.

Any person who violates any provision of this chapter or any rule or regulation or order of the director issued pursuant to this chapter shall be strictly liable to the state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1997, ch. 32, § 2.

46-12.5.1-4.
Ballast water discharge.

Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, no person shall cause or permit the discharge of contaminated ballast water from a vessel into the water of the state.

The master of a vessel may discharge contaminated ballast water from a vessel only if it is necessary for the safety of the vessel and no alternative action is feasible to ensure the safety of the vessel.

History of Section.

P.L. 1997, ch. 32, § 2.

46-12.5.1-5.
Discharge reporting.

A person in charge of a facility, operation or vessel, as soon as the person has knowledge of any discharge from the facility, operation, or vessel in violation of this chapter shall, in a timely fashion, notify the department of the discharge.

History of Section.

P.L. 1997, ch. 32, § 2.

46-12.5.1-6.
Civil penalties for discharge of oil.

The legislature finds that:

Oil is important as an energy source to the people of the state; however, the discharge of oil in any quantity may have a substantial permanent or negative impact on the public health and environment and the economy of this state in that it contaminates the land and water supplies and renders land unfit for use and water unfit for use and consumption; degrades, damages, and destroys the abundant natural beauty of the state; and kills marine and aquatic organisms at all stages of development;

The citizens of this state should not have to bear the burdens of the cleanup and the losses of economic livelihood that result from the discharge of oil in any degree; and

Substantial civil penalties should be imposed in order to provide an incentive to insure the safe handling of oil and to prevent the discharge of oil onto the land or into the waters of the state;

The director shall promulgate rules and regulations pursuant to the Administrative Procedures Act, as set forth in chapter 35 of title 42, that establish administrative penalties for discharges of oil, which penalties shall not exceed the sum of twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) for each day during which the violation occurs. In determining the administrative penalty for the discharge of oil, the director shall consider several factors, including, but not limited to:

The type of environment that the discharge oil enters, such as, but not limited to, a stream or tributary thereto that is capable of or has historically supported anadromous fish; a freshwater environment with significant or substantial aquatic resources; or an estuarine, intertidal, or salt water environment;

The amount of oil spilled;

The type of oil spilled;

The toxicity, degradability, and dispersal characteristics of the oil spilled; and

Any mitigating action that the vessel master or the facility owner or operator may have taken to stop or to control the discharge of oil.

The entire penalty specified in the regulations shall be imposed, except that a person who discharges oil into a receiving environment may demonstrate, by a preponderance of evidence, that mitigating circumstances relating to the effects of the discharge would make imposition of the full penalty inappropriate. If mitigating circumstances are proven by a preponderance of the evidence, the director may reduce or eliminate the penalty, in accordance with the purposes of this section.

A person otherwise liable for administrative penalties under subsection (e) of this section shall not be liable if the person demonstrates, by a preponderance of the evidence, that the discharge occurred solely as a result of:

An act of God;

An act of a third person, unless the third person is a person with whom the person charged is made jointly and severally liable under this section;

A negligent or intentional act of the United States; or

An act of war.

Nothing in this section shall preclude the director from assessing additional penalties for the discharge of oil as set forth in chapters 12 of this title, 17.1 and 17.6 of title 42, and 19.1 of title 23.

Nothing in this section shall preclude the state or any private party from seeking damages and/or penalties in an action brought pursuant to any other provision of the general laws or pursuant to common law or to limit the damages which can be awarded in such an action.

History of Section.

P.L. 1997, ch. 32, § 2.

46-12.5.1-7.
Damages.

In addition to penalties established in this chapter, any person who violates or causes or permits to be violated a provision of this chapter or rule, regulation, or order pursuant thereto, shall be strictly liable to the state for these costs and expenses:

Compensation for any adverse environmental effects caused by the violation, which the court shall determine according to the toxicity, degradability, and dispersal characteristics of the substance discharged, the nature and sensitivity of the receiving environment, and the degree to which the discharge degrades existing environmental quality;

Costs that the state has incurred in detection, investigation, and correction of the violation;

The economic advantage that the person realized in not complying with the requirements and provisions of this chapter.

Liability for damages under subsection (a) of this section includes an amount equal to the sum of money required to restock injured land or waters, to replenish a damaged or degraded resource, or to otherwise restore the environment of the state to its condition before the injury.

Nothing in this section shall preclude the state or any private party from seeking additional damages and/or penalties in a civil action brought pursuant to any other provision of the general laws or pursuant to common law, or to limit the damages which can be awarded in such an action.

History of Section.

P.L. 1997, ch. 32, § 2.

46-12.5.1-8.
Reimbursement for cleanup expenses — Deposit of money.

The department shall promptly seek reimbursement under this chapter or from an applicable federal fund, for the expenses it incurs in the cleanup, containment, or abatement of a discharge of oil. If the department obtains reimbursement for a portion of its expenses from a federal fund, the remainder of the expenses incurred may be recovered as set forth in this chapter.

There is hereby established an account within the general fund to be called the oil release response fund. All monies collected pursuant to this chapter shall be deposited into this fund, which shall be administered in accordance with chapter 12.7 of this title.

History of Section.

P.L. 1997, ch. 32, § 2.

46-12.5.1-9.
Proceedings for enforcement.

The superior court shall have the jurisdiction to enforce the provisions of this chapter and any rule, regulation, or order issued pursuant thereto. Proceedings for enforcement may be instituted by the attorney general or the director, and in any proceedings in which the attorney general or the director seeks injunctive relief, it shall not be necessary to show that without the relief, the injury that will result will be irreparable or that the remedy at law is inadequate. Proceedings provided in this section shall be in addition to other administrative or judicial proceedings authorized by this chapter or pursuant to any other provision of the general laws or common law.

History of Section.

P.L. 1997, ch. 32, § 2.

46-12.5.1-10.
Criminal penalties.

Except as provided in subsection (c), a person who willfully or with criminal negligence violates a provision of this chapter, or of a rule or regulation promulgated under this chapter or order of the director issued under this chapter shall be punished by a fine of not more than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000), or by imprisonment for not more than five (5) years, or by both such a fine and imprisonment; and every person shall be deemed guilty of a separate and distinct offense for each day during which the violations shall be repeated or continued.

Any person who knowingly makes any false statement, representation, or certification in any application, record, report, plan, or other document filed or required to be maintained under this chapter or by any permit, rule, regulation, or order issued under this chapter or who falsifies, tampers with, or knowingly renders inaccurate any monitoring device or method required to be maintained under this chapter, shall, upon conviction, be punished by a fine of not more than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) for each instance of violation, or by imprisonment for not more than five (5) years, or by both a fine and imprisonment.

Notwithstanding subsection (a), a person who fails to provide or falsely states information required under § 46-12.5-4 [Repealed] shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History of Section.

P.L. 1997, ch. 32, § 2.

46-12.5.1-11.
Emergency powers.

The director shall have all emergency powers and procedures set forth in §

46-12-10

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1997, ch. 32, § 2.

46-12.5.1-12.
Notices of violations and compliance orders.

The director shall follow the procedures provided in §

42-17.1-2(21)

in issuing any notice of violation or compliance order authorized pursuant to this chapter or any rules, regulations, or permits promulgated thereunder.

Where an order of the director does not otherwise specify, the person against whom an order is entered shall, within seventy-two (72) hours of the receipt of the order and before proceeding to install a system or means to contain, abate, control, and remove the discharged oil, submit to the director a plan or a statement describing the system or means that the person intends to implement.

Any order or notice issued by the director shall be eligible for recordation under chapter 13 of title 34. The director shall forward the original order or notice to the city or town wherein the subject property is located and the order or notice shall be recorded in the land evidence records in the city or town wherein the subject property is located. Any subsequent transferee of that property shall be responsible for complying with the requirements of the order or notice. Upon satisfactory completion of the requirements of the order or notice, the director shall provide written notice of the same, which notice shall be similarly eligible for recordation. The original written notice shall be forwarded to the city or town wherein the subject property is located and the notice of satisfactory completion shall be recorded in the land evidence records in the city or town wherein the subject property is located.

History of Section.

P.L. 1997, ch. 32, § 2; P.L. 2008, ch. 475, § 29; P.L. 2021, ch. 147, § 5, effective July 3, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 148, § 5, effective July 3, 2021.

46-12.5.1-13.
Remedies cumulative.

All remedies provided by this chapter or chapter 12.7 of this title are cumulative, and the securing of relief, whether injunctive, civil, or criminal, under a section of this chapter or chapter 12.6 or 12.7 of this title does not stop the state or any person from obtaining relief under any other section of this chapter or chapter 12.6 or 12.7 of this title, or pursuant to any other provision of the general laws or the common law.

History of Section.

P.L. 1997, ch. 32, § 2.

46-12.5.1-14.
Oil discharge cleanup personnel, equipment, expenses.

In the absence of an alternative, the department, when feasible, shall enter into contracts with persons or private organizations to provide the personnel, equipment, or other services or supplies which may be required to carry out this chapter. Contracts under this section are governed by chapter 2 of title 37. When private contracting is not feasible, the department may establish and maintain at ports, harbors, or other locations in the state, the cleanup personnel, equipment, and supplies which, in its judgment, are necessary to carry out this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1997, ch. 32, § 2.

46-12.5.1-15.
Compacts authorized.

The governor may execute supplementary agreements, reciprocal arrangements, or compacts with any other state or country, subject to the approval, if required by the United States Constitution, of the Congress of the United States, for the purpose of implementing this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1997, ch. 32, § 2.